Maine, session 132, LD1928.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA c. 15-B is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 15-B
SINGLE-USE PLASTIC CONTAINERS
§1581. Personal health or beauty product single-use plastic containers; lodging
establishments
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Lodging establishment" means a building or portion of a building that is regularly
used to provide lodging to guests. "Lodging establishment" includes, but is not limited
to, a hotel, motel, resort, bed and breakfast, inn, time-share property, short-term rental
and vacation rental. "Lodging establishment" does not include a hospital, nursing
home, residential retirement community, prison, jail, homeless shelter, boarding
school, worker housing or long-term rental.
B. "Lodging unit" means a room intended to be used for a sleeping accommodation
located in a lodging establishment.
C. "Personal health or beauty product" means a product intended to be applied to or
used on the human body for cleansing, conditioning or moisturizing. "Personal health
or beauty product" includes, but is not limited to, shampoo, conditioner, soap, body
wash, shower gel and body lotion.
D. "Plastic" means a synthetic or semisynthetic material that is synthesized by the
polymerization of organic substances and is capable of being shaped into various rigid
and flexible forms.
E. "Small plastic container" means a plastic container, including a plastic bottle, plastic
wrapper, plastic sachet or any other single-use plastic packaging, with less than a
6-ounce capacity that is not intended to be reusable by the end user.
2. Prohibition. A lodging establishment may not provide a personal health or beauty
product in a small plastic container in accordance with this subsection.
A. Beginning January 1, 2030, a lodging establishment with 50 or more lodging units
may not provide a personal health or beauty product in a small plastic container to a
person staying in a lodging unit or within a bathroom shared by the public and guests
of the lodging establishment.
B. Beginning January 1, 2032, a lodging establishment with fewer than 50 lodging
units may not provide a personal health or beauty product in a small plastic container
to a person staying in a lodging unit or within bathrooms shared by the public and
guests of the lodging establishment.
C. This section does not:
(1) Restrict the use of plastic refillable containers for personal health or beauty
products; or
Page 1 - 132LR1213(01)

(2) Restrict the use of single-use personal health or beauty product containers,
bottles, wrappers or packaging that are not made with plastic.
3. Enforcement. In addition to the enforcement actions allowed under section 347-A:
A. If the department has reason to believe that a lodging establishment is in violation
of this section, the department may direct the lodging establishment to provide the
department with a certificate attesting that the lodging establishment is in compliance
with this section; and
B. For failure to comply with paragraph A, the lodging establishment commits a civil
violation for which a fine of $100 must be adjudged.
4. Exemptions. This section does not apply to stand-alone cabins, cottages or
apartments that are located on a single parcel of land, owned by the same person and have
a capacity to provide lodging to no more than 12 guests. For the purposes of this
subsection, "stand-alone" means a building containing a single unit made up of a room or
group of rooms.
5. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
by the department pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.